Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 2

Transitional Provisions

5-5-201. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-5-201 (Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 35; T.C.A., § 5-551; Acts 1980, ch. 841, § 1; 1981, ch. 74, §§ 1, 2), relating to transitional provisions concerning forms of government established by private acts, was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 623, § 1.

5-5-202. County bonds.

It is the intent of the general assembly to preserve the rights and privileges of holders of outstanding county bonds and other indebtedness. The respective counties shall continue to be liable upon all outstanding bonds and other indebtedness for which they were liable prior to May 11, 1978, and nothing in this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title shall be construed to abolish, limit or abrogate any rights or privileges heretofore existing in any holders of such outstanding bonds or indebtedness.

With respect to county bonds and other indebtedness, the county mayor established by this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title shall succeed to all rights and duties heretofore existing as to any officers whose functions are assumed in whole or part by the county mayor pursuant to this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title. Likewise with respect to county bonds and other indebtedness, the county legislative body established by this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title shall succeed to all rights and duties heretofore existing as to any entities whose functions are assumed in whole or part by the county legislative body pursuant to this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title.

Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 34; T.C.A., § 5-552; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-5-203. Effect on private and other acts.

Any law, private act or general act of local application in conflict with any provision of this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title is hereby repealed.

Any law, private act or general law of local application not in conflict with this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title shall remain in full force and effect; provided, that any conflict shall be construed in favor of implementing this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title and repealing the conflicting law.

Nothing in this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title shall be construed as affecting the operation or existence of boards, commissions, committees or other agencies of local government except as necessary to avoid conflict with express provisions hereof.

Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 40, 41; T.C.A., § 5-553.